District of Columbia statutes.
47-1351

Certificate of sale — as evidence.

The certificate of sale or assignment of the certificate of sale is presumptive evidence in all judicial proceedings by and against the purchaser, and the purchaser’s representatives, heirs and assigns, of the:

(1)

Truth of the statements in the certificate of sale or assignment of the certificate of sale;

(2)

Interest of the purchaser in the real property described;

(3)

Regularity and validity of all proceedings regarding the taxes for which the real property was sold; and

(4)

Sale of the real property.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).